Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2611
Enforcement of environmental covenant.

(a) A civil action for injunctive or other equitable relief for violation of an environmental covenant may be maintained by:

(1) A party to the covenant;

(2) The agency;

(3) Any person to whom the covenant expressly grants power to enforce;

(4) A person whose interest in the real property or whose collateral or liability may be affected by the alleged violation of the covenant; or

(5) A municipality or other unit of local government in which the real property subject to the covenant is located.

(b) The Uniform Environmental Covenants Act does not limit the regulatory authority of the agency under law other than the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act with respect to an environmental response project.

(c) A person is not responsible for or subject to liability for environmental remediation solely because it has the right to enforce an environmental covenant.

(d) The Uniform Environmental Covenants Act does not limit the right of any person to recover damages under any other provision of law.

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 12.